Hawaii statutes.
[§577-25] Emancipation of certain minors.
Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, a minor who has been married pursuant
to chapter 572 shall be deemed to be emancipated and shall be regarded as
though he or she were of legal age and shall have all the rights, duties,
privileges, and responsibilities provided by the civil law to a person who has
reached the age of majority under civil law; provided that:

(1) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to confer
upon such person the right to vote in any federal, state, or county election or
the right to purchase, possess, or sell alcoholic beverages; and

(2) Nothing in this section shall change the status
of such persons as minors in connection with any criminal law, nor affect the
exclusive original jurisdiction of the family court over such persons under
section 571-11(1).

For purposes of this section, "minor"
means a person under the age of majority. [L 1976, c 164, §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next